apertium-eu-hu.eu.lexc
LEXICON IRITSI

LEXICON TOPATU

LEXICON Tu

+V+Root: # ;
+V: Nominalization ;
+V+Prc:%>tu #;
+V:%>tu Fut;
+V+Abl:%>turik # ;
+V+Sub+Temp:%>tuz # ;
+Adv:%>tuta # ;
+Adv+LGen:%>tutako # ;

LEXICON Du

+V+Root: # ;
+V: Nominalization ;
+V+Prc:%>du #;
+V:%>du Fut;
+V+Sub+Temp:%>duz # ;
+Adv:%>duta # ;

LEXICON Sinmas

+V+Root: # ;
+V: Nominalization ;
+V+Prc: #;
+V: Fut;
+V+Sub+Temp:%>ez # ;
+N:%>da CASES ;
+A:%>ta # ; !Or Adv ?

LEXICON I

+V: Nominalization ;
+V+Root: # ;
+V+Prc:%>i #;
+V:%>i Fut;
+N:%>ida CASES ;
+A:%>ita # ; !Or Adv ?

LEXICON N

+V:%> Nominalization ;
+V+Root:%>n # ;
+V+Prc:%>n #;
+V:%>n Fut2 ;
+N:%>nda CASES ;
+A:%>nta # ; !Or Adv ?

LEXICON Nominalization

+Der/N:%>tze # ;
+Der/N:%>tze Nominalization2 ;
+Der/N:%>te # ;
+Der/N:%>te Nominalization2 ;

LEXICON Nominalization2

+Sub:%>ko # ;
+Art:%>a # ; !! Should this go to the SgCases1 continuation 
+All:%>ra # ;
+Cont:%>n # ;

LEXICON Fut

+Fut:%>ko # ;

LEXICON Fut2

+Fut:%>go # ;

LEXICON EGON
+V+Prc:egon # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:egote # ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:egon # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:%>ba EGONTENSE ;
+V+Ind: EGONTENSE ; !

LEXICON EGONTENSE
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg1:%>nago SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>hago SUBCL ; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg2:%>zaude SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3:%>dago SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl1:%>gaude SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl2:%>zaudete SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3:%>daude SUBCL ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg1:%>nengoen SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>hengoen SUBCL ; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg2:%>zeunden SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3:%>zegoen SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl1:%>geunden SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl2:%>zeundeten SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3:%>zeuden SUBCL ;

LEXICON JOAN
+V+Prc:joan # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:joate Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:joan # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba JOANTENSE ;
+V+Ind: JOANTENSE ; !

LEXICON JOANTENSE
+Prs+Abs/Sg1:%>noa SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>hoa SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Abs/Sg2:%>zoaz SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3:%>doa SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl1:%>goaz SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl2:%>zoazte SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3:%>doaz SUBCL ;

+Prt+Abs/Sg1:%>nindoan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>hindoan SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Abs/Sg2:%>zinoazen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3:%>zihoan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl1:%>gindoazen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl2:%>zindoazten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3:%>zihoazen SUBCL ;

LEXICON IBILI
+V+Prc:ibili # ; !Partizip
+V+Fut:ibiliko # ;
+V+Der/N:ibiltze Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:ibil # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba IBILITENSE ;
+V+Ind: IBILITENSE ; !

LEXICON IBILITENSE
+Prs+Abs/Sg1:%>nabil SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>habil SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Abs/Sg2:%>zabiltza SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3:%>dabil SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl1:%>gabiltza SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl2:%>zabiltzate SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3:%>dabiltza SUBCL ;

+Prt+Abs/Sg1:%>nenbilen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>henbilen SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Abs/Sg2:%>zenbiltzan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3:%>zebilen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl1:%>genbiltzan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl2:%>zenbiltzaten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3:%>zebiltzan SUBCL ;

LEXICON ETORRI2
+V+Prc:etorri # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:etortze Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:etor # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Ind: ETORRITENSE ; !
+V+Cond:ba ETORRITENSE ;
+V+Sub+Temp:etorriz # ;

LEXICON ETORRITENSE
+Prs+Abs/Sg1:%>nator SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>hator SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Abs/Sg2:%>zatoz SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3:%>dator SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl1:%>gatoz SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl2:%>zatozte SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3:%>datoz SUBCL ;

+Prt+Abs/Sg1:%>nentorren SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg2+ifl:%>hentorren SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Abs/Sg2:%>zentozen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3:%>zetorren SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl1:%>gentozen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl2:%>zentozten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3:%>zetozten SUBCL ;


LEXICON ERAMAN
+V+Prc:eraman # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:eramate Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:eraman # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba ERAMANTENSE ;
+V+Ind: ERAMANTENSE ; !

LEXICON ERAMANTENSE
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:%>daraman SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2+ifl/f:%>daraman SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2+ifl/m:%>daramak SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:%>daramazu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:%>drama SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:%>daramagu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:%>daramazue SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:%>daramate SUBCL ;

+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:%>daramatzan SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2+ifl/f:%>daramatzan SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2+ifl/m:%>daramatzak SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:%>daramatzazu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:%>dramatza SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:%>daramatzagu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:%>daramatzazue SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:%>daramatzate SUBCL ;

+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:%>neraman SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2+ifl:%>heraman SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:%>zeneraman SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:%>zeraman SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:%>generaman SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:%>zeneramaten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:%>zeramaten SUBCL ;

+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:%>neramatzan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2+ifl:%>heramatzan SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:%>zeneramatzan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:%>zeramatzan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:%>generamatzan SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:%>zeneramatzaten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:%>zeramatzaten SUBCL ;

LEXICON ESAN
+V+Prc:esan # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:esate Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:esan # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba ESANTENSE ;
+V+Ind: ESANTENSE ; !

LEXICON ESANTENSE
+Prs+Erg/Sg1:%>diot SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg2+ifl/f:%>dion SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Erg/Sg2+ifl/m:%>diok SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg2:%>diozu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg3:%>dio SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl1:%>diogu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl2:%>diozue SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl3:%>diote SUBCL ;

+Prt+Erg/Sg1:%>nioen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Sg2+ifl:%>hioen SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Erg/Sg2:%>zenioen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Sg3:%>zioen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl1:%>genioen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl2:%>zenioten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl3:%>zioten SUBCL ;

LEXICON EKARRI
+V+Prc:ekarri # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:ekartze Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:ekar # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba EKARRITENSE ;
+V+Ind: EKARRITENSE ; !

LEXICON EKARRITENSE
+Prs+Erg/Sg1:%>dakart SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg2+ifl/f:%>dakarn SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Erg/Sg2+ifl/m:%>dakark SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg2:%>dakarzu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg3:%>dakar SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl1:%>dakargu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl2:%>dakarzue SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl3:%>dakarte SUBCL ;

+Prt+Erg/Sg1:%>nekarn SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Sg2+ifl:%>hekarn SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Erg/Sg2:%>zenekarn SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Sg3:%>zekarn SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl1:%>genekarn SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl2:%>zenekarten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl3:%>zekarten SUBCL ;

LEXICON IRUDITU
+V+Prc:iruditu # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:iruditze Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:irudi # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba IRUDITUTENSE ;
+V+Ind: IRUDITUTENSE ; !

LEXICON IRUDITUTENSE
+Prs+Dat/Sg1:%>dirudit SUBCL ;
+Prs+Dat/Sg2+ifl/f:%>dirudin SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Dat/Sg2+ifl/m:%>dirudik SUBCL ;
+Prs+Dat/Sg2:%>dirudizu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Dat/Sg3:%>dirudi SUBCL ;
+Prs+Dat/Pl1:%>dirudigu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Dat/Pl2:%>dirudizue SUBCL ;
+Prs+Dat/Pl3:%>dirudite SUBCL ;

+Prt+Dat/Sg1:%>nirudien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Dat/Sg2+ifl:%>hirudien SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Dat/Sg2:%>zenirudien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Dat/Sg3:%>zirudien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Dat/Pl1:%>genirudien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Dat/Pl2:%>zeniruditen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Dat/Pl3:%>ziruditen SUBCL ;

LEXICON EDUKI
+V+Prc:eduki # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:edukitze Nominalization2 ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:eduki # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:%>ba EDUKITENSE ;
+V+Ind: EDUKITENSE ; !

LEXICON Verbs
aberatstu:abera%{t%}s Tu ; !"get# rich"
abestu:abes Tu ; !"sing"
abiatu:abia Tu ; !"start"
adierazadierazi:adieraz I ; !"declare"
afaldu:afal Du ;
agindu:agin Du ; !"order"
agurtu:agur Tu ; !"greet"
ahal Sinmas ; !"can"
ahaztu:ahaz Tu ; !"forget"
akusatu:akusa Tu ;
aldatu:alda Tu ; !"change"
animatu:anima Tu ;
areagotu:areago Tu ; !"increase"
argitu:argi Tu ; !"clear"
aritu:ari Tu ; !"busy# oneself"
atxilotu:atxilo Tu ; !"arrest"
aukeratu:aukera Tu ; !"choose"
aurkitu:aurki Tu ; !"find"
aurreikusi:aurreikus I ; !"forsee"
aurreratu:aurrera Tu ; !"advance"
azaldu:azal Du ;
baieztatu:baiezta Tu ; !"confirm"
baloratu:balora Tu ; !"value"
banandu:banan Du ; !"differ"
baztertu:bazter Tu ; !"retreat"
begiratu:begira Tu ; !"look"
behar Sinmas ; !"must"
behartu:behar Tu ;
bete Sinmas ; !"complete"
bilakatu:bilaka Tu ; !"turn# into"
bilatu:bila Tu ;
bildu:bil Du ;
bisitatu:bisita Tu ; !"visit"
borrokatu:borroka Tu ; !"fight"
bota Sinmas ;
burutu:buru Tu ;
defenditu:defendi Tu ; !"defend"
deklaratu:deklara Tu ; !"declare"
derrigortu:derrigor Tu ; !"force" 
edan Sinmas ; !"drink"
eduki: EDUKI ; !"have"
egin:egi N ; !"do" 
egokitu:egoki Tu ; !"adapt"
egon: EGON ; ! ; !"be"
ehizatu:ehiza Tu ; !"hunt"
ekarri:ekarr I ; !"bring"
ekidin:ekidi N ; !"avoid"
elkartu:elkar Tu ; !"meet"
entzun Sinmas ; !"hear"
erabili:erabil I ; !"use"
eraman: ERAMAN ; !"bring"
eragin:eragi N ; !"oblige"
erakutsi:erakuts I ;
erantzun Sinmas ; !"answer"
erre Sinmas ; !"burn"
errapatu:errapa Tu ; !"realize"
errespetu:erraspe Tu ; !"respect"
esan: ESAN ; !"say"
eskaini:eskain I ; !"offer"
eskatu:eska Tu ; !"order"
ekarri: EKARRI ; !"bring"
eraso: Sinmas ; !"attack"
eskaini:eskain I ; !"offer"
existitu:existi Tu ;
ezin Sinmas ; !"can not"
ezkondu:ezkon Du ;
faltatu:falta Tu ; !"miss"
flotatu:flota Tu ;
gainditu:gaindi Tu ; !"pass"
galdetu:galde Tu ; !"ask"
gehitu:gehi Tu ; !"increase"
gelditu:geldi Tu ; !"stay"
gezurtatu:gezurta Tu ; !"lie"
grabatu:graba Tu ; !"record"
gertatu:gerta Tu ; !"happen"
gonbidatu:gonbida Tu ; !"invite"
gosaldu:gosal Du ; !"breakfast"
gozatu:goza Tu ; !"enjoy"
grabatu:graba Tu ; !"tape"
handitu:handi Tu ; !"grow"
hartu:har Tu ; !"take"
haserretu:haserre Tu ; !"get angry"
hasi:has I ; !"begin"
hautatu:hauta Tu ; !"choose"
hautsi:hauts I ;
hazi:haz I ;
hitzartu:hitzar Tu ; !"agree"
hondatu:honda Tu ; !"destroy"
hornitu:horni Tu ;
hustu:hus Tu ;
ibili: IBILI ; !"walk"
igo Sinmas ; !"ascend"
ikasi:ikas I ; !"learn"
ikusi:ikus I ; !"see"
inputatu:inputa Tu ;
irabazi:irabaz I ; !"earn"
irakin Sinmas ; !"boil"
irauli:iraul I ; !"turn# over"
iraun:irau N ; !"last"
iritsi:irits I ; !"arrive"
irten:irte N ; !"leave"
iruditu: IRUDITU ; !"seem"
islatu:isla Tu ;
isuri:isur I ; !"flow"
itxi:itx I ; !"close"
jaitsi:jaits I ; !"go# down"
jan Sinmas ; !"eat"
jarri:jarr I ; !"put" !R
jasan:jasa N ;
jaso Sinmas ;
jaurtitu:jaurti Tu ; !"throw"
jipoitu:jipoi Tu ; !"beat# up"
jo Sinmas ;
joan: JOAN ; !"go"
jokatu:joka Tu ; !"play"
jolastu:jolas Tu ;
juzkatu:juzka Tu ;
kezkatu:kezka Tu ; !"worry"
kokatu:koka Tu ;
konparatu:konpara Tu ; !"compare"
konpondu:konpon Du ; !"resolve"
kontatu:konta Tu ; !"tell"
kontrolatu:kontrola Tu ; !"control"
konturatu:kontura Tu ; !"notice"
landu:lan Du ;
landatu:landa Tu ; !"plant"
laztanddu:laztand Du ;
lortu:lor Tu ; !"achieve";
lotu:lo Tu ; !"tie"
maitemindu:maitemin Du ; !"fall# in love"
manifestatu:manifesta Tu ;
mimatu:mima Tu ;
mintzatu:mintza Tu ; !"talk"
moldatu:molda Tu ;
moztu:moz Tu ; !"cut"
mugitu:mugi Tu ;
nahastu:nahas Tu ; !"mix"
nahi Sinmas ; !"want"
nozitu:nozi Tu ; !"suffer"
onartu:onar Tu ; !"accept"
oparitu:opari Tu ; !"give"
otu:o Tu ; !"occur"
onartu:onar Tu ; !"admit"
oroitu:oroi Tu ;
osatu:osa Tu ; !"complete"
pasatu:pasa Tu ; !"happen"
prestatu:presta Tu ; !"prepare" 
saiatu:saia Tu ; !"try"
sartu:sar Tu ; !"enter"
segitu:segi Tu ; 
sortu:sor Tu ;
topatu:topa Tu ; !"meet" 
ukitu:uki Tu ; !"touch"
ulertu:uler Tu ; !"understand"
utzi:utz I ; !"leave"
zabaldu:zabal Du ; !"widen"
zaindu:zain Du ; !"take# care"
zauritu:zauri Tu ; !"be# injured"
zeharkatu:zerharka Tu ; !"cross" 
zintzilikatu:zintzilika Tu ; !"hang"
ziurtatu:ziurta Tu ; !"secure"
zorabiatu:zorabia Tu ; !"faint"
zuritu:zuri Tu ; !"hurt"
